Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 15.6 Temporary Housing for Disaster Victims

30-15.6-1.
Powers of governor.

Whenever the governor has declared a disaster emergency to exist under the laws of this state, or the president of the United States, at the request of the governor, has declared a major disaster or emergency to exist in this state, the governor is authorized:

To enter into purchase, lease, or other arrangements with any agency of the United States for temporary housing units to be occupied by disaster victims and to make these units available to any political subdivision of the state;

To assist any political subdivision of this state that is the locus of temporary housing for disaster victims to acquire sites necessary for temporary housing and to do all things required to prepare the site to receive and utilize temporary housing units, by:

Advancing or lending funds available to the governor from any appropriation made by the general assembly or from any other source;

“Passing through” funds made available by any agency, public or private; or

Becoming a co-partner with the political subdivision for the execution and performance of any temporary housing for disaster victims project and, for those purposes, to pledge the credit of the state on such terms as the governor deems appropriate, having due regard for current debt transactions of the state; and

Under such regulations as the governor shall prescribe, to temporarily suspend or modify, for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days, any public health, safety, zoning, transportation (within or across the state), or other requirement of law or regulation within this state when by proclamation, the governor deems the suspension or modification essential to provide temporary housing for disaster victims.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 40.

30-15.6-2.
Powers of political subdivisions.

Any political subdivision of this state is expressly authorized to acquire, temporarily or permanently, by purchase, lease, or otherwise, sites required for the installation of temporary housing units for disaster victims, and to enter into whatever arrangements (including purchase of temporary housing units and the payment of transportation charges) are necessary to prepare or equip those sites to utilize the housing units.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 160, § 1.

30-15.6-3.
Rules and regulations.

The governor is authorized to make rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 160, § 1.

30-15.6-4.
Grants, gifts, and payments.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to limit the governor’s authority to apply for, administer, and expend any grants, gifts, or payments, in aid of disaster prevention, preparedness, response, or recovery.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 160, § 1.

30-15.6-5.
Definitions.

“Major disaster”, “emergency”, and “temporary housing”, as used in this chapter, shall have the same meaning as the terms are defined, or used, in the Disaster Relief Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. §§ 5121 — 5201.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 160, § 1.